Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

7-56-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Cooperative Act".

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 478, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-101 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The cooperative form of doing business provides an efficient and effective method for persons to market their goods and services and to obtain services and supplies and it is in the best interests of the people of the state of Colorado to promote, foster, and encourage the utilization of cooperatives in appropriate instances;

The cooperative marketing law of the state of Colorado has provided for the promotion, fostering, and encouragement of the intelligent and orderly marketing of agricultural products through cooperation; has eliminated speculation and waste; has made distribution of agricultural products between producer and consumer more efficient; has stabilized the marketing of agricultural products; and has provided for the organization and incorporation of cooperative marketing associations for the marketing of such products, all as contemplated at the time of the original adoption of the cooperative marketing law;

It is in the best interests of the people of the state of Colorado to preserve the provisions of the cooperative marketing law as it has been in force and interpreted in the state and to continue the provisions thereof for agriculture, but also to expand the provisions of the law to provide greater direction and flexibility in its provisions and to enable all types of industries and enterprises to avail themselves of the benefits of the cooperative form of doing business in accordance with the provisions of this article;

It is in the best interests of the people of the state of Colorado to allow those cooperatives that have been formed under or are subject to other articles of this title, such as article 55, to remain under said article or to elect to come under this article.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 478, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(d) amended, p. 2219, § 66, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-102 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agricultural cooperative" means a cooperative in which the members, including landlords and tenants, are all producers of agricultural products.

"Agricultural products" means agronomic, horticultural, viticultural, aquacultural, forestry, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee, and any other farm or ranch products.

"Articles" means the articles of incorporation of a cooperative and includes amended articles of incorporation, restated articles of incorporation, and other organizational documents of other entities.

"Board" or "board of directors" means the board of directors or other governing body of a cooperative or other entity.

"Bylaws" means the bylaws adopted by a cooperative and includes amended bylaws and restated bylaws.

"Cooperative" means any entity formed under or subject to this article by election or otherwise, including a cooperative formed under comparable law of another jurisdiction doing business in this state, and having the following characteristics:

The business of the cooperative is operated at cost by adjusting the prices charged for goods or services or by returning any net margins at the end of a fiscal year on a patronage basis to members and other persons qualified to share in the net margins pursuant to the articles or bylaws;

Dividends on stock or interest on equity capital is limited, as prescribed in the articles pursuant to section 7-56-201 or bylaws pursuant to section 7-56-208 of the cooperative;

Voting rights are limited to members of the cooperative as prescribed in the articles or bylaws of the cooperative;

The cooperative's business is carried on for the mutual benefit of its members; and

Members are not liable for any debt, obligation, or liability of the cooperative.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2219, § 67, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Domestic", when referring to a cooperative or other entity, means an entity formed under the law of this state.

"Equity capital" means all investments in the cooperative except loans or other types of indebtedness, whether made by direct investment, such as investment in stock or memberships, or by retention of amounts of net savings, net margins, or net profits allocated to members and other patrons of the cooperative, or charged to them as part of the transactions between them and the cooperative.

"Foreign", when referring to a cooperative or other entity, means an entity formed under law other than the law of this state.

"Member" means a person who has been received into the membership of a cooperative without common stock or a person who has acquired common stock in a cooperative formed with common stock and, in either case, is authorized to vote. This subsection (11) shall not preclude a cooperative from designating persons as both members and stockholders.

"Net margins" means the receipts from operations less the expenses thereof.

"Patron" means a person who may, but need not, be a member of a cooperative who utilizes the services of the cooperative through the purchase or sale of property or services to or from the cooperative.

"Patronage" means the volume or dollar value of business transacted with the cooperative.

"Patronage refund" means a portion of a cooperative's net margins paid or allocated to a patron based on the patron's patronage.

"Per unit retain" means a deduction authorized by a patron to be made by the cooperative from proceeds of sale of a product or service by the patron to the cooperative or by the cooperative on behalf of the patron where the deduction is based on the value or quantity of the product or service sold to the cooperative or on behalf of the patron and is deducted as a contribution or investment by the patron in the capital of the cooperative.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2219, § 67, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 479, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(6), (7), (8), (10), (11), and (17) amended, p. 2219, § 67, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(10) amended, p. 1410, § 36, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-101 and 7-56-103 as they existed prior to 1996.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-56-104. Filings by the secretary of state.

Part 3 of article 90 of this title, providing for the filing of documents, applies to any document filed or to be filed by the secretary of state pursuant to this article.

Repealed.

to (6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1815, § 17, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1679, § 15, October 1, 2002.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 481, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1815, § 17, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1679, § 15, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2220, § 68, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) repealed, p. 1410, § 37, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-56-104 and 7-56-132 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-105. Effective time and date of documents. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 482, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-56-106. Periodic and other reports.

Part 5 of article 90 of this title, providing for periodic reports from reporting entities, applies to cooperatives formed under or subject to this article.

The commissioner of agriculture may, by regulation, require reports from any cooperative formed pursuant to this article that limits its membership to agricultural producers.

Upon the dissolution of an agricultural cooperative formed under this article, the cooperative shall provide a copy of the articles of dissolution of the cooperative to the commissioner of agriculture.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 483, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2220, § 69, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1410, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1993, § 3, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-122 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-107. Cooperative records.

A cooperative shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its members and of the board, a record of all actions taken by the members or the board without a meeting by a written unanimous consent in lieu of a meeting, and a record of all waivers of notices of meetings of the members and of the board.

A cooperative shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A cooperative shall maintain its records in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

A cooperative shall keep a copy of each of the following records at its principal office:

Its articles of incorporation or other governing instrument;

Its bylaws or other similar instrument;

A record of the names and addresses of its members, in a form that permits preparation of a list of members that is alphabetical and that shows each member's address and the investment qualifying a member to vote held by each member;

The minutes of members' meetings, and records of all actions taken by members without a meeting by unanimous written consent in lieu of a meeting, for the past three years;

All written communications within the past three years to members as a group or to any class of members as a group;

A list of the names and business addresses of its current board of directors and officers;

A copy of its most recent periodic report delivered to the secretary of state pursuant to part 5 of article 90 of this title; and

All financial statements prepared for periods ending during the last fiscal year.

Except as otherwise limited by this article, the board of directors of a cooperative shall have discretion to determine what records are appropriate for the purposes of the cooperative, the length of time records are to be retained, and policies relating to the confidentiality, disclosure, inspection and copying of the records of the cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 483, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(4)(g) amended, p. 950, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4)(g) amended, p. 2220, § 70, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2010:

(4)(g) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1994, § 4, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-122 as it existed prior to 1996.